Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 2

Commutation of Interests

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 8 provided in part that all interests in property commuted prior to July 1, 1981, would not in any manner be disturbed or reopened because of the passage of the act.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 8: effective as to all decrees ordering commutation issued on or after July 1, 1981.

18-2-101. Purpose.

(a)

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish a simple and accurate method for computing the present value of both vested life and remainder interests in property through the use of actuarial tables and to make the actuarial tables used in connection therewith current.

(b)

Nothing contained in this subchapter is intended:

(1)

To provide when a court shall order a life interest commuted and so payable in gross; or

(2)

To change the existing jurisdiction of the courts under which such a decree requiring commutation may issue.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-701.

18-2-102. Commutation of single life interest.

In any legal proceeding wherein the court shall decree that a vested right to future income for life from property is to be commuted and an amount payable in gross be substituted for the property right, then the value of the interest shall be computed by use of the table and in the manner described in the example appearing in §18-2-105 unless parties to the proceeding submit an agreement for a division of the proceeds which the court approves.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-702.

18-2-103. Choice of age.

The appropriate age for use in the table is that of the person whose life expectancy serves to measure the life interest being valued.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-703.

18-2-104. Choice of interest.

The court shall determine the interest rate to be used upon the basis of the prevailing interest rates obtainable for investments.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-704.

18-2-105. Table and example.

(a)

Table:

Age Average Remaining Lifetime Immediate Whole Life Annuity at Various Rates of Interest 4% 6% 8% 10% 12% Years Years Dollars Dollars Dollars Dollars Dollars 1 74.97 23.6260 16.4428 12.4579 9.9913 8.3314 2 75.37 23.6474 16.4480 12.4592 9.9917 8.3315 3 74.47 23.5988 16.4362 12.4562 9.9909 8.3313 4 73.54 23.5467 16.4234 12.4530 9.9901 8.3311 5 72.59 23.4916 16.4095 12.4494 9.9891 8.3308 6 71.63 23.4337 16.3947 12.4455 9.9881 8.3306 7 70.67 23.3736 16.3791 12.4413 9.9869 8.3302 8 69.70 23.3105 16.3623 12.4368 9.9857 8.3299 9 68.73 23.2450 16.3446 12.4319 9.9843 8.3295 10 67.75 23.1763 16.3257 12.4266 9.9827 8.3290 11 66.77 23.1048 16.3057 12.4208 9.9811 8.3285 12 65.80 23.0313 16.2847 12.4147 9.9792 8.3279 13 64.82 22.9542 16.2623 12.4080 9.9772 8.3273 14 63.84 22.8740 16.2385 12.4008 9.9749 8.3266 15 62.87 22.7916 16.2136 12.3931 9.9725 8.3258 16 61.90 22.7059 16.1872 12.3848 9.9699 8.3249 17 60.94 22.6179 16.1597 12.3760 9.9670 8.3240 18 59.97 22.5255 16.1302 12.3664 9.9638 8.3229 19 59.02 22.4316 16.0996 12.3562 9.9603 8.3217 20 58.06 22.3330 16.0670 12.3452 9.9565 8.3204 21 57.10 22.2307 16.0325 12.3333 9.9524 8.3189 22 56.15 22.1256 15.9964 12.3207 9.9479 8.3172 23 55.19 22.0153 15.9579 12.3069 9.9429 8.3154 24 54.24 21.9020 15.9175 12.2923 9.9374 8.3134 25 53.29 21.7844 15.8749 12.2765 9.9315 8.3111 26 52.33 21.6610 15.8293 12.2594 9.9250 8.3085 27 51.38 21.5342 15.7817 12.2412 9.9178 8.3057 28 50.42 21.4012 15.7308 12.2213 9.9100 8.3025 29 49.47 21.2646 15.6775 12.2002 9.9014 8.2990 30 48.52 21.1228 15.6212 12.1774 9.8921 8.2951 31 47.57 20.9756 15.5617 12.1530 9.8819 8.2908 32 46.62 20.8229 15.4988 12.1266 9.8707 8.2860 33 45.68 20.6660 15.4330 12.0986 9.8586 8.2806 34 44.73 20.5015 15.3628 12.0682 9.8452 8.2747 35 43.79 20.3325 15.2894 12.0358 9.8306 8.2681 36 42.86 20.1591 15.2127 12.0014 9.8149 8.2608 37 41.92 19.9773 15.1309 11.9639 9.7976 8.2526 38 40.99 19.7907 15.0454 11.9242 9.7788 8.2437 39 40.07 19.5993 14.9561 11.8819 9.7586 8.2338 40 39.14 19.3987 14.8608 11.8361 9.7362 8.2228 41 38.23 19.1952 14.7625 11.7879 9.7123 8.2107 42 37.31 18.9819 14.6576 11.7356 9.6859 8.1973 43 36.41 18.7657 14.5494 11.6808 9.6578 8.1827 44 35.50 18.5391 14.4341 11.6214 9.6268 8.1663 45 34.60 18.3070 14.3139 11.5584 9.5934 8.1484 46 33.71 18.0693 14.1887 11.4916 9.5574 8.1287 47 32.83 17.8259 14.0583 11.4210 9.5186 8.1073 48 31.95 17.5739 13.9211 11.3454 9.4765 8.0836 49 31.08 17.3162 13.7783 11.2654 9.4313 8.0577 50 30.21 17.0495 13.6281 11.1799 9.3821 8.0291 51 29.35 16.7767 13.4720 11.0896 9.3293 7.9980 52 28.49 16.4946 13.3078 10.9931 9.2720 7.9637 53 27.65 16.2097 13.1393 10.8924 9.2113 7.9267 54 26.80 15.9118 12.9602 10.7838 9.1448 7.8856 55 25.97 15.6110 12.7766 10.6706 9.0744 7.8415 56 25.14 15.3004 12.5838 10.5499 8.9982 7.7930 57 24.31 14.9794 12.3815 10.4212 8.9157 7.7397 58 23.49 14.6519 12.1718 10.2858 8.8276 7.6818 59 22.68 14.3179 11.9545 10.1434 8.7335 7.6192 60 21.88 13.9774 11.7297 9.9938 8.6332 7.5514 61 21.09 13.6305 11.4971 9.8367 8.5263 7.4782 62 20.30 13.2727 11.2536 9.6697 8.4110 7.3981 63 19.53 12.9132 11.0052 9.4969 8.2900 7.3128 64 18.76 12.5426 10.7454 9.3136 8.1598 7.2198 65 18.00 12.1657 10.4773 9.1216 8.0216 7.1196 66 17.25 11.7825 10.2008 8.9209 7.8750 7.0120 67 16.51 11.3933 9.9159 8.7111 7.7197 6.8964 68 15.78 10.9981 9.6225 8.4922 7.5554 6.7724 69 15.06 10.5971 9.3207 8.2638 7.3817 6.6397 70 14.35 10.1903 9.0104 8.0259 7.1984 6.4978 71 13.67 9.7901 8.7010 7.7856 7.0108 6.3508 72 13.01 9.3912 8.3887 7.5399 6.8167 6.1968 73 12.38 9.0007 8.0791 7.2935 6.6197 6.0387 74 11.77 8.6133 7.7684 7.0432 6.4174 5.8744 75 11.18 8.2297 7.4572 6.7897 6.2101 5.7044 76 10.61 7.8506 7.1462 6.5337 5.9986 5.5290 77 10.04 7.4629 6.8247 6.2661 5.7752 5.3418 78 9.48 7.0734 6.4982 5.9916 5.5435 5.1458 79 8.93 6.6825 6.1671 5.7102 5.3037 4.9408 80 8.40 6.2978 5.8377 5.4275 5.0604 4.7308 81 7.90 5.9274 5.5176 5.1500 4.8193 4.5208 82 7.42 5.5649 5.2014 4.8734 4.5768 4.3077 83 6.98 5.2266 4.9036 4.6107 4.3445 4.1018 84 6.57 4.9061 4.6192 4.3578 4.1191 3.9006 85 6.17 4.5884 4.3351 4.1033 3.8906 3.6950 86 5.80 4.2900 4.0664 3.8608 3.6713 3.4964 87 5.43 3.9873 3.7918 3.6112 3.4441 3.2892 88 5.09 3.7052 3.5342 3.3755 3.2282 3.0911 89 4.77 3.4362 3.2870 3.1480 3.0185 2.8975 90 4.47 3.1810 3.0510 2.9296 2.8160 2.7095 91 4.18 2.9314 2.8190 2.7136 2.6146 2.5216 92 3.92 2.7052 2.6076 2.5158 2.4293 2.3478 93 3.69 2.5032 2.4179 2.3375 2.2616 2.1897 94 3.50 2.3350 2.2593 2.1878 2.1201 2.0560 95 3.33 2.1833 2.1159 2.0520 1.9914 1.9339 96 3.18 2.0487 1.9882 1.9307 1.8761 1.8242 97 3.06 1.9404 1.8852 1.8326 1.7827 1.7351 98 2.95 1.8407 1.7901 1.7419 1.6961 1.6523 99 2.85 1.7497 1.7032 1.6588 1.6165 1.5752 100 2.77 1.6766 1.6333 1.5919 1.5524 1.5146

Click to view table.

(b)

Example:

Joe Doe is entitled to receive the income from a principal sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) during the life of one Martha Jones, fifty-five (55) years of age. There is a emainder estate in favor of Timothy Doe. In an appropriate proceeding a court in Arkansas has determined that the life tenant is to be paid a lump sum in commutation of his right to income for the life of Martha Jones; the court has further determined that four percent (4%) is the rate of interest obtainable on an investment of a sum of the size of the principal sum. In the table, follow the left-hand column, which is labeled “age”, down vertically until fifty-five (55) is reached; then move horizontally until the column headed “4%” is intersected. At the intersection is found the figure: 15.6110. This figure is to be multiplied by the yearly income, which is found by multiplying the principal sum by the appropriate rate of interest. In this case that would be ten thousand dollars ($10,000) multiplied by .04 equalling four hundred dollars ($400). Then 15.6110 multiplied by four hundred dollars ($400) equals six thousand two hundred forty-four dollars and forty cents ($6,244.40). This is the sum which the court would direct to be paid to Joe Doe in commutation of his income right. Timothy Doe would be paid three thousand seven hundred fifty-five dollars and sixty cents ($3,755.60). See §18-2-106: principal sum ten thousand dollars ($10,000)

minus

commuted life interest six thousand two hundred forty-four dollars and forty cents ($6,244.40) equals commuted remainder three thousand seven hundred fifty-five dollars and sixty cents ($3,755.60).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-705.

18-2-106. Commutation of remainder interest.

The present value of a remainder interest is found by subtracting from the principal sum the value of the commuted life interest as determined by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 350, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-706.